Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2216
Agents; license required.

All individuals selling individual variable annuities must be licensed to write variable contracts in this state under the Insurance Producers Licensing Act.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 16, p. 1265;

Laws 1995, LB 162, § 5.

Insurance Producers Licensing Act, see section 44-4047.